assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
abastecer/hRDILP
ablentar/RDI
aborrecer/PLRID
absolver/RLI
abuolar/RDI
acentuar/RDAI
acordar/hRID
actuar/RIDA
adiar/RID
adonecer/IRDL
adormentar/RID
aducir/XIDA
agorar/RDI
agriar/RID
ahincar/RI
ahuchar/RDI
ahusar/IRD
albeldar/RDI
alebrar/RDI
aliquebrar/RDI
almorzar/DRI
amanecer/SRDLI
amarillecer/IiDRL
amoblar/hRDI
amollecer/RILD
amortecer/IRLDP
aneblar/RID
ansiar/RID
apacentar/RPDI
apernar/RDI
apretar/IhRpD
arbolecer/RDIL
arcaizar/RID
arrendar/RhDsI
arruar/IRD
asir/IRPD
aspaventar/RDI
atender/RhDLI
aterecer/RLDI
atesar/I
atraer/hXDLI
aullar/IRD
aupar/RID
avanecer/IRDL
averiar/IRD
azolar/RID
beldar/aRID
biografiar/DRI
cablegrafiar/RID
calcografiar/RDI
calofriar/RDI
canecer/iRDIL
cariar/RIBD
cegar/RIPD
cerrar/RPIBD
cinematografiar/RID
clarecer/aRILD
cocer/RphLID
colgar/RhDI
comenzar/pRID
comparecer/ILRD
comprobar/RAID
concordar/RDI
conducir/pXID
conocer/nRpDLhI
consolar/hRDI
contextuar/RDI
contraer/XI
convalecer/RIpLD
crecer/PgIRLahpD
cromolitografiar/RDI
cuchichiar/RDI
degollar/PRDABI
denegar/AI
dentar/RihID
desasir/RPI
desatentar/I
desbruar/RDI
descarriar/DRIP
descollar/PI
descordar/RDI
desencerrar/RI
deslendrar/RID
desmembrar/RIAP
desolar/AI
desollar/RDIB
desosegar/RI
despernar/RDI
despezar/RDI
desterrar/RI
desventar/I
desviar/RPAID
detraer/XI
discontinuar/RAID
disolver/RIL
distender/DRILQ
dolar/RDBI
educir/XgID
eflorecer/IRLD
embarnecer/RPLID
embaular/RhID
embellaquecer/RILD
embermejecer/RLID
embobecer/RDIPL
embravecer/RLhIPD
emparentar/RIED
empedrar/RhDI
empezar/IRD
emplumecer/RDIL
empoltronecer/RIDL
emputecer/RLID
enardecer/RLIDP
encallecer/RILD
encandecer/IRDL
encarnecer/RIDL
encloquecer/IRLD
encontrar/pRDI
encordar/hIRD
encovar/hRIDE
encruelecer/RLDI
endurecer/RIDLP
enfestar/I
enfortecer/RILD
enfurecer/RhLID
engorar/RID
engrosar/hRID
enhestar/DRBIP
enlenzar/RID
enllocar/IRD
enlustrecer/RILD
enmarillecer/RIDL
enmohecer/hDRIL
enmudecer/RhILD
ennoblecer/RPIDL
enorgullecer/RPIDL
enrarecer/RILPD
enriquecer/RLPDI
enrojecer/RIPDL
enrudecer/hRLID
ensandecer/IRLD
ensarnecer/IRDL
ensoberbecer/hRLID
ensombrecer/RILD
entender/rRDthLsI
enterrar/RhIDP
entestecer/RDIL
entontecer/RDIPL
entortar/RDI
entristecer/RPLID
entumecer/RhPIDL
envanecer/DRIPL
enviar/RDIQ
envolver/hRIPL
escaecer/RILD
escalofriar/RID
escarnecer/RIDLP
escocer/RDgBI
esforzar/RID
esmorecer/IgRLD
espiar/RID
ester/IGS
estriar/RDI
evaluar/RIDA
exceptuar/RID
extasiar/RDI
extenuar/DRIA
extraviar/RID
favorecer/RhIDL
fiar/fRDI
follar/ERDI
forzar/RhpDI
fotografiar/RID
fregar/RupDI
ganzuar/RID
gobernar/hRDI
grandisonar/RDI
guarnecer/hRLID
habituar/RhDI
hastiar/iRDI
heder/RILD
hender/RIBL
herbecer/IRLD
herrar/hRpID
hojecer/RDIL
hollar/pRDI
incensar/I
inducir/XIADP
infernar/RID
inquirir/IXD
introducir/DXIA
jamerdar/RDI
judaizar/RDIA
lentecer/RpDLI
litofotografiar/RID
lividecer/RID
lobreguecer/iRLID
lucir/nRuIjiphD
malentender/RDIL
maltraer/XIDL
manifestar/RDAI
melar/BRDI
merendar/RID
moblar/aI
moler/pRgLDI
mostrar/RID
nacer/RpPLID
nevar/RhDI
oblicuar/RID
ofrecer/RIPDL
orinecer/DRIL
padecer/RILDP
palidecer/IRiDL
parecer/IhDjRLa
perder/RLIPAD
permanecer/RIDL
perpetuar/ARDI
piar/RQDI
pipiar/RID
plastecer/iRLID
poblar/hPRADI
porfiar/RDI
prevalecer/RILD
producir/pXAID
prohijar/RDPI
puntuar/RDAI
querer/hXID
radiotelegrafiar/IRD
reblandecer/RLIPD
recomendar/RDAI
recrudecer/RLIPD
reducir/XDAIP
regar/BRID
regoldar/RDI
rehundir/RI
reilar/RDI
remanecer/LRID
remostecer/RILD
renovar/AI
repoblar/RAI
resfriar/RIPBD
resolver/RLI
resquebrar/IBRCD
restregar/RIBPD
retoecer/RLID
retraer/XPI
reunir/I
revejecer/RLID
robustecer/RIPD
rodar/iRDI
ruar/RDI
sahumar/RDIg
salpimentar/RID
seducir/XAID
segar/RpID
sementar/IRD
serrar/aRID
sobrehilar/I
soler/ISG
sonar/pRafDI
soar/RIiD
soterrar/ERIPD
sustraer/XLID
taquigrafiar/RDI
tatuar/RIDC
temblar/pRID
tender/iRLDI
torcer/RhfpLDI
traducir/XIAD
traillar/RaDI
trascender/RILD
trascordar/RID
trasoar/RDI
trastrocar/RIDP
travesar/aRDI
trocar/RIhD
unir/hRpID
vaciar/IRDP
variar/RIDA
verter/pRrIDL
volcar/pDRI
xerografiar/RDI
zurriar/RDI
